Utah statutes.
53A-25-106.   Board member expenses.
No member of the board may receive compensation for services as a member of
the board, but the members shall be paid for their actual expenses incurred in
attending meetings of the board or of its committees, or in attending to any
business of the school under the authority of the board or of its committees.
